District of Columbia statutes.
21-2117

Existing interests; foreign interests.

The powers described in sections 21-2103 through 21-2116 are exercisable equally with respect to an interest the principal has when the power of attorney is executed or acquires later, whether or not the property is located in the District of Columbia, and whether or not the powers are exercised or the power of attorney is executed in the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-147, § 2, 45 DCR 3853

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2117.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Uniform Statutory Form Power of Attorney Act.